New York, session 2025-2026, A9619.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "urban rail 2 station and underpass lighting act (URSULA)". 3 § 2. The legislature finds that insufficient lighting under elevated 4 train stations and rail underpasses creates safety hazards, contributes 5 to higher crime rates, and impairs accessibility for pedestrians, 6 cyclists, and motorists. Modern, energy-efficient lighting can reduce 7 these risks, enhance visibility, and improve community well-being. 8 In particular, corridors such as Roosevelt Avenue beneath the 7 train 9 demonstrate the urgent need for comprehensive and uniform lighting 10 solutions. These areas are heavily trafficked, commercially vital, and 11 often cited by residents and businesses as unsafe due to inadequate 12 lighting. 13 § 3. Urban rail station and underpass lighting pilot program. 1. The 14 commissioner of transportation, in consultation with the metropolitan 15 transportation authority, shall establish and implement a pilot program 16 to improve lighting in rail stations and underpasses located in cities 17 with a population of over one million. 18 2. The pilot program shall include at least three high-density rail 19 corridors within two years of the effective date of this act, with 20 priority to be given to Roosevelt Avenue under the 7 train. Selected 21 corridors shall receive new lighting which is in compliance with EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13833-02-6 A. 9619 2 1 nationally recognized safety standards, including those of the Illumi- 2 nating Engineering Society (IES) or equivalent standards. 3 (a) Lighting provided pursuant to this pilot program shall be either: 4 (i) continuous Wabash-style lighting along the underside of elevated 5 structures; or (ii) pedestrian-scale lighting posts at intervals not to 6 exceed twenty-five feet for underpass spans and fifteen to twenty feet 7 for pedestrian pathways. 8 (b) When selecting light fixtures to be installed pursuant to such 9 pilot program, priority shall be given to LED, solar-powered, or other 10 sustainable technologies. 11 3. The department of transportation, in conjunction with the metropol- 12 itan transportation authority shall conduct regular inspections of sites 13 selected for participation in this pilot program to ensure compliance 14 with safety standards. 15 4. Within three years of the effective date of this section, the 16 department of transportation shall submit a report to the legislature 17 detailing the results of such pilot program and making recommendations 18 regarding the expansion of such program. Such report shall include 19 information on crime reduction, pedestrian safety, community feedback, 20 and cost-effectiveness. 21 § 4. The transportation law is amended by adding a new section 15-d to 22 read as follows: 23 § 15-d. Infrastructure grant program; lighting urban rail stations and 24 underpasses. 1. There is hereby established within the department an 25 infrastructure grant program to provide matching grants to munici- 26 palities and transportation authorities that improve lighting in rail 27 stations and underpasses located in cities with a population over one 28 million by installing new lighting which is in compliance with 29 nationally recognized safety standards, including those of the Illumi- 30 nating Engineering Society (IES) or equivalent standards. 31 (a) Lighting provided pursuant to this program shall be either: (i) 32 continuous Wabash-style lighting along the underside of elevated struc- 33 tures; or (ii) pedestrian-scale lighting posts at intervals not to 34 exceed twenty-five feet for underpass spans and fifteen to twenty feet 35 for pedestrian pathways. 36 (b) Priority shall be given to lighting projects that prioritize the 37 use of LED, solar-powered, or other sustainable technologies. 38 2. Participation in the grant program shall be voluntary and subject 39 to local budget appropriations. 40 3. Participating municipalities may allocate a portion of existing 41 transportation or infrastructure funds to qualify for matching grants 42 pursuant to this section. 43 4. The department of transportation, in conjunction with the metropol- 44 itan transportation authority, shall conduct regular inspections of 45 sites selected for participation in the grant program to ensure compli- 46 ance with safety standards. 47 5. Provided that partnership agreements, sponsorships, or shared cost 48 models are not prohibited by any other law, rule, or regulation to the 49 contrary, nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit private 50 entities, including but not limited to energy providers, developers, and 51 other stakeholders, from entering into partnership agreements, sponsor- 52 ships, or shared cost models with municipalities for the purpose of 53 improving lighting in rail stations and underpasses. 54 § 5. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended by 55 adding a new section 23-315 to read as follows: A. 9619 3 1 § 23-315 Urban rail station and underpass lighting complaints. a. The 2 department of information technology and telecommunications, in consul- 3 tation with the department of transportation and the metropolitan trans- 4 portation authority shall implement and maintain through its 311 custom- 5 er service center, mobile device platform, and any other platform that 6 the center routinely uses to accept complaints, the capability for the 7 public to file a complaint under the category of "urban rail station and 8 underpass lighting". Such department of information technology and tele- 9 communications shall collect the complaint details and documentation set 10 forth in subdivision b of this section and send any such complaint and 11 documentation to the department of transportation and the metropolitan 12 transportation authority. 13 b. A person submitting a complaint under the category of "urban rail 14 station and underpass lighting" shall have the ability to submit the 15 following documentation with such complaint: 16 1. Photographic evidence supporting such complaint; 17 2. Information relating to any accidents or injuries that have 18 occurred at a specific location as a result of inadequate lighting; and 19 3. The address or a description of the location which clearly identi- 20 fies the exact location of the urban rail station or underpass which is 21 inadequately lit. 22 § 6. The commissioner of transportation shall promulgate rules and 23 regulations for the implementation of this act within one year of the 24 effective date of this section. 25 § 7. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 26 law; provided, however, that section three of this act shall expire five 27 years after such effective date when upon such date the provisions of 28 such section shall be deemed repealed. Effective immediately, the addi- 29 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 30 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 31 be made and completed on or before such effective date.